Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4110.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 Sec. 7. (1) The disclosures required by this act shall must be made on the following form: SELLER'S DISCLOSURE STATEMENT Property Address: __________________________________________ Street 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 _________________________________ Michigan City, Village, or Township Purpose of Statement: This statement is a disclosure of the condition of the property in compliance with the seller disclosure act. This statement is a disclosure of the condition and information concerning the property, known by the seller. Unless otherwise advised, the seller does not possess any expertise in construction, architecture, engineering, or any other specific area related to the construction or condition of the improvements on the property or the land. Also, unless otherwise advised, the seller has not conducted any inspection of generally inaccessible areas such as the foundation or roof. This statement is not a warranty of any kind by the seller or by any agent representing the seller in this transaction, and is not a substitute for any inspections or warranties the buyer may wish to obtain. Seller's Disclosure: The seller discloses the following information with the knowledge that even though this is not a warranty, the seller specifically makes the following representations based on the seller's knowledge at the signing of this document. Upon receiving On receipt of this statement from the seller, the seller's agent is required to shall provide a copy to the buyer or the agent of the buyer. The seller authorizes its agent(s) the seller's agent or agents to provide a copy of this statement to any prospective buyer in connection with any actual or anticipated sale of property. The following are representations made solely by the seller and are not the representations of the seller's agent(s), agent or agents, if any. THIS INFORMATION IS A DISCLOSURE ONLY AND IS NOT INTENDED TO BE A PART OF ANY CONTRACT 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 BETWEEN BUYER AND SELLER. Instructions to the Seller: (1) Answer ALL questions. (2) Report known conditions affecting the property. (3) Attach additional pages with your signature if additional space is required. (4) Complete this form yourself. (5) If some items do not apply to your property, check NOT AVAILABLE. If you do not know the facts, check UNKNOWN. FAILURE TO PROVIDE A PURCHASER WITH A SIGNED DISCLOSURE STATEMENT WILL ENABLE A PURCHASER TO TERMINATE AN OTHERWISE BINDING PURCHASE AGREEMENT. Appliances/Systems/Services: The items below are in working order (the items below are included in the sale of the property only if the purchase agreement so provides): Yes No Unknown Not Available Range/Ovenoven ____ ____ ____ ____ Dishwasher ____ ____ ____ ____ Refrigerator ____ ____ ____ ____ Hood/fan ____ ____ ____ ____ Disposal ____ ____ ____ ____ TV antenna, TV rotor & controls ____ ____ ____ ____ Electrical system ____ ____ ____ ____ Garage door opener & remote control ____ ____ ____ ____ Alarm system ____ ____ ____ ____ Intercom ____ ____ ____ ____ Central vacuum ____ ____ ____ ____ Attic fan ____ ____ ____ ____ Pool heater, wall liner & equipment ____ ____ ____ ____ 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Microwave ____ ____ ____ ____ Trash compactor ____ ____ ____ ____ Ceiling fan ____ ____ ____ ____ Sauna/hot tub ____ ____ ____ ____ Washer ____ ____ ____ ____ Dryer ____ ____ ____ ____ Lawn sprinkler system ____ ____ ____ ____ Water heater ____ ____ ____ ____ Plumbing system ____ ____ ____ ____ Water softener/conditioner ____ ____ ____ ____ Well & pump ____ ____ ____ ____ Septic tank & drain field ____ ____ ____ ____ Sump pump ____ ____ ____ ____ City Water Systemwater system ____ ____ ____ ____ City Sewer Systemsewer system ____ ____ ____ ____ Central air conditioning ____ ____ ____ ____ Central heating system ____ ____ ____ ____ Wall furnace ____ ____ ____ ____ Humidifier ____ ____ ____ ____ Electronic air filter ____ ____ ____ ____ Solar heating system ____ ____ ____ ____ Fireplace & chimney ____ ____ ____ ____ Wood burning system ____ ____ ____ ____ Explanations (attach additional sheets if necessary): 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 _______________________________________________________________ _______________________________________________________________ _______________________________________________________________ _______________________________________________________________ _______________________________________________________________ UNLESS OTHERWISE AGREED, ALL HOUSEHOLD APPLIANCES ARE SOLD IN WORKING ORDER EXCEPT AS NOTED, WITHOUT WARRANTY BEYOND DATE OF CLOSING. Property conditions, improvements & additional information: 1. Basement/crawl space: Has there been evidence of water? yes____ no____ If yes, please explain: _____________________________________ 2. Insulation: Describe, if known _______________________________ Urea Formaldehyde Foam Insulation (UFFI) is installed? unknown____ yes____ no____ 3. Roof: Leaks? yes____ no____ Approximate age if known ____________________________________ 4. Well: Type of well (depth/diameter, age, and repair history, if known): _________________________________________________________ Has the water been tested? yes____ no____ If yes, date of last report/results: ________________________ 5. Septic tanks/drain fields: Condition, if known: ______________ _____________________________________________________________ 6. Heating System: Type/approximate age: ________________________ 7. Plumbing system: Type: copper____ galvanized____ other____ Any known problems? _________________________________________ 8. Electrical system: Any known problems? _______________________ 9. History of infestation, if any: (termites, carpenter ants, etc.) _____________________________________________________________ 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 10. Environmental Problems:problems: Are you aware of any substances, materials, or products that may be an environmental hazard such as, but not limited to, asbestos, radon gas, formaldehyde, lead-based paint, fuel or chemical storage tanks, and contaminated soil on the property. unknown____ yes____ no____ If yes, please explain:_____________________________________ 11. Flood insurance: Do you have flood insurance on the property? unknown____ yes____ no____ 12. Mineral rights: Do you own the mineral rights? unknown____ yes____ no____ Other Items: Are you aware of any of the following: 1. Features of the property shared in common with the adjoining landowners, such as walls, fences, roads and driveways, or other features whose use or responsibility for maintenance may have an effect on the property? unknown____ yes____ no____ 2. Any encroachments, easements, zoning violations, or nonconforming uses? unknown____ yes____ no____ 3. Any "common areas" (facilities like pools, tennis courts, walkways, or other areas co-owned with others), or a homeowners' association that has any authority over the property? unknown____ yes____ no____ 4. Structural modifications, alterations, or repairs made without necessary permits or licensed contractors? unknown____ yes____ no____ 5. Settling, flooding, drainage, structural, or grading problems? unknown____ yes____ no____ 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 6. Major damage to the property from fire, wind, floods, or landslides? unknown____ yes____ no____ 7. Any underground storage tanks? unknown____ yes____ no____ 8. Farm or farm operation in the vicinity; or proximity to a landfill, airport, shooting range, etc.? unknown____ yes____ no____ 9. Any outstanding utility assessments or fees, including any natural gas main extension surcharge? unknown____ yes____ no____ 10. Any outstanding municipal assessments or fees? unknown____ yes____ no____ 11. Any pending litigation that could affect the property or the seller's right to convey the property? unknown____ yes____ no____ If the answer to any of these questions is yes, please explain. Attach additional sheets, if necessary: _________________________ _________________________________________________________________ _________________________________________________________________ _________________________________________________________________ _________________________________________________________________ 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 The seller has lived in the residence on the property from _________________ (date) to _________________ (date). The seller has owned the property since _________________ (date). The seller has indicated above the condition of all the items based on information known to the seller. If any changes occur in the structural/mechanical/appliance systems of this property from the date of this form to the date of closing, seller will immediately disclose the changes to buyer. In no event shall circumstances will the parties hold the broker liable for any representations not directly made by the broker or broker's agent. Seller certifies that the information in this statement is true and correct to the best of seller's knowledge as of the date of seller's signature. BUYER SHOULD OBTAIN PROFESSIONAL ADVICE AND INSPECTIONS OF THE PROPERTY TO MORE FULLY DETERMINE THE CONDITION OF THE PROPERTY. THESE INSPECTIONS SHOULD TAKE INDOOR AIR AND WATER QUALITY INTO ACCOUNT, AS WELL AS ANY EVIDENCE OF UNUSUALLY HIGH LEVELS OF POTENTIAL ALLERGENS INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, HOUSEHOLD MOLD, MILDEW AND BACTERIA. 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 BUYERS ARE ADVISED THAT CERTAIN INFORMATION COMPILED PURSUANT TO THE SEX OFFENDERS REGISTRATION ACT, 1994 PA 295, MCL 28.721 TO 28.732, 28.730, IS AVAILABLE TO THE PUBLIC. BUYERS SEEKING THAT INFORMATION SHOULD CONTACT THE APPROPRIATE LOCAL LAW ENFORCEMENT AGENCY OR SHERIFF'S DEPARTMENT DIRECTLY. BUYER IS ADVISED THAT THE NEW ESTIMATED ANNUAL REAL PROPERTY TAXES ON THE PROPERTY WILL BE $____________, BASED ON THE CURRENT STATE EQUALIZED VALUE, WITHOUT ANY REDUCTION IN THE STATE EQUALIZED VALUE FOR THE LIMITATION ON INCREASES IN THE TAXABLE VALUE UNDER SECTION 3 OF ARTICLE IX OF THE STATE CONSTITUTION OF 1963, AND ALSO BASED ON THE CURRENT APPLICABLE MILLAGE RATES FOR PROPERTY TAXES AND ON THE PROPERTY BEING CLAIMED AS A PRINCIPAL RESIDENCE UNDER SECTION 7CC OF THE GENERAL PROPERTY TAX ACT, 1893 PA 206, MCL 211.7CC. BUYER IS ADVISED THAT THE STATE EQUALIZED VALUE OF THE PROPERTY, PRINCIPAL RESIDENCE EXEMPTION INFORMATION, AND OTHER REAL PROPERTY TAX INFORMATION IS AVAILABLE FROM THE APPROPRIATE LOCAL ASSESSOR'S OFFICE. BUYER SHOULD NOT ASSUME THAT BUYER'S FUTURE TAX BILLS ON THE PROPERTY WILL BE THE SAME AS THE SELLER'S PRESENT TAX BILLS. UNDER MICHIGAN LAW, REAL PROPERTY TAX OBLIGATIONS CAN CHANGE SIGNIFICANTLY WHEN PROPERTY IS TRANSFERRED. Seller_________________________ Date_________________________ Seller_________________________ Date_________________________ Buyer has read and acknowledges receipt of this statement. Buyer_______________ Date________________ Time:_______________ Buyer_______________ Date________________ Time:_______________ (2) A form described in subsection (1) printed before January 1 2 3 4 5 1, 2006 the effective date of the amendatory act that amended this section that was in compliance with this section at that time may be utilized used and shall be is considered to be in compliance with this section until April 1, 2006.90 days after the effective date of the amendatory act that amended this section.